Utah statutes.
11-46-202.   Definitions.

In addition to the definitions in Section 11-46-102, as used in this part:

(1)  "Proof of sterilization" means a written document signed by a veterinarian licensed under Title 58, Chapter 28, Veterinary Practice Act, stating:

(a)  a specified animal has been sterilized;

(b)  the date on which the sterilization was performed; and

(c)  the location where the sterilization was performed.

(2)  "Recipient" means the person to whom an animal shelter transfers an animal for adoption.

(3)  "Sterilization deposit" means the portion of a fee charged by an animal shelter to a recipient or claimant of an unsterilized animal to ensure the animal is timely sterilized in accordance with an agreement between the recipient or the claimant and the animal shelter.

(4)  "Sterilized" means that an animal has been surgically altered either by the spaying of a female animal or by the neutering of a male animal, so it is unable to reproduce.

(5)  "Transfer" means that an animal shelter sells, gives away, places for adoption, or transfers an animal to a recipient.

